Utah statutes.
53A-3-201.   Election of officers -- Terms -- Time of election -- Removal of
officers -- Quorum requirements.
(1)  A local school board shall elect a president and a vice-president whose
terms of office are for two years and until their successors are elected.
(2)  The elections shall be held during the first board meeting in January
following a regular school board election held in the district.
(3)  An officer appointed or elected by a local school board may be removed
from office for cause by a vote of two-thirds of the board.
(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the office of president or vice president of the
board for any reason, a replacement shall be elected for the unexpired term.
(5)  Attendance of a simple majority of the board members constitutes a quorum
for the transaction of official business.
